Utah statutes.
13-10b-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Audiovisual recording function" means the capability of a device to record or transmit a motion picture or any part of the motion picture by means of any technology.

(2)  "Motion picture theater" means a movie theater, screening room, or other venue that is being utilized primarily for the exhibition of a motion picture at the time of the commission of an offense under Section 13-10b-201.

(3)  "Owner or employee" means the owner or lessee of a motion picture theater, or the authorized agent or employee of the owner or lessee.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 2007 General Session

